Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201286-138
Application denial.

If the commission refuses to grant an application
made pursuant to section 86-135, no new application for the same advanced telecommunications capability service
shall be filed or shall be considered by the commission until one year has
elapsed after the date of mailing of the commission order.

Laws 1969, c. 601, § 4, p. 2458;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 111;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 75-615;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 37;

Laws 2012, LB715, § 7.